Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-269
Failure to comply with summons or subpoena; contempt.

If the person summoned or subpoenaed as provided in sections 43-262 to 43-268 shall without reasonable cause fail to appear and abide the order of the court or bring the juvenile, he or she may be proceeded against as in the case of contempt of court.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 25.